Missouri, session 2026, HB8.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated, for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
PART 1
Section 8.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 2
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Public
Safety in implementing the appropriations found in Part 1 and
Part 2 of this act. An appropriation may be comprised in whole
or in part of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall
be construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-
time may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a
new decision item.
Section 8.005. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service (including $1,189,601 one-time) ........................................$4,080,208
Annual Salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................16,740
Expense and Equipment (including $110,000 one-time) ......................... 445,208
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,542,156
Personal Service ..................................................................................................471,403
Annual Salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo .........................................................................................................................575
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,163,031
From Justice Assistance Grant Fund (1782) ................................................................1,635,009
Personal Service ..................................................................................................441,019
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 420,155
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................861,174
Personal Service ....................................................................................................95,374
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,164

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 3
From Services to Victims Fund (1592) ...........................................................................105,538
Personal Service ..................................................................................................693,869
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 53,843
From Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund (1681) .........................................................747,712
For the purpose of providing funding to procure a commercial, real-time
automated victim notification system for use by the Missouri
Department of Public Safety, Missouri Sheriffs, and Missouri
Department of Corrections allowing victims to register a single
time in order to receive timely and reliable updates regarding an
offender’s custody status, and the system shall integrate with any
DPS IT infrastructure; the contracted commercial entity shall
house and maintain information necessary to provide automated
victim notifications and provide a 24/7 call center for victim
support
From Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund (1681) .........................................................699,999
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Crime Prevention Information and Programming Fund
(1253) ......................................................................................................................1,000
Expense and Equipment
From Antiterrorism Fund (1759) .....................................................................................15,000
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,694,524
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,600,371
From Department of Public Safety Federal Homeland Security Fund
(1193) .............................................................................................................23,294,895
Personal Service ..................................................................................................118,998
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 813,000
From MODEX Fund (1867) ..........................................................................................931,998
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies, provided
the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of any new
funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended, in
writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
Personal Service ..................................................................................................168,331

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 4
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,155,000
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................9,323,331
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
National Guard Federal Forfeiture Fund
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194) (one-time) ......................................................900,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Public Safety Federal Fund
From Homeland Security Fund (1154) (one-time) ............................................. 732
Total (Not to exceed 85.03 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$43,058,544
Section 8.006. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For a police officer recruitment and retention program to include mental
health resources, office and administration costs located in a city
not within a county with such program being administered and
overseen by an African American police officer association that
supports efforts in reducing crime in a city not in a county and
county with more than one million inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000
For a cybercrime task force in a county with more than one hundred
twenty thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................300,000
For the Missing and Murdered African American Women and Girls Task
Force to develop and report policies addressing violence against
African American Women and girls, with findings submitted
annually to the Governor and General Assembly
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................116,000
For construction and improvements to a jail located in any county with
more than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than four hundred but fewer
than one thousand inhabitants provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 75/25 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 5
For the purpose of funding a Youth and Police Initiative Train the Trainer
program that focuses on building relationships and prevention
programming between youth and law enforcement
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................200,000
For the purpose of funding a pilot program to provide research, data
analysis, and study the potential for automated emergency
notifications from 911 dispatch to enhance the reliability and
timeliness of alerts sent to schools in the event of nearby threats
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For a non-profit organization that supports sheriffs and the constitution
through legislative efforts, training and technical assistance, in an
effort to make communities a safer, more enjoyable place to live,
to work and to raise a family located in any city with more than
forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants for the purpose of the
maintenance, upgrade and enhancement of the secure Missouri
concealed carry weapon licensure computer database
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................250,000
For construction and improvements to a regional law enforcement center
located in any county with more than two hundred sixty thousand
but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................4,000,000
For a fire protection district located in a city with more than thirty
thousand but fewer than thirty-three thousand inhabitants and
located in a county with more than seven hundred thousand but
fewer than eight hundred thousand inhabitants to support the
operations of the fire protection district’s mobile integrated
healthcare and community paramedic program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................100,000
For personnel services for a jail located in any city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 6
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Public
Safety Recruitment and Retention Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000
For the administration of the Public Safety Recruitment and Retention
Act
From Public Safety Recruitment and Retention Fund (1467) .....................................5,000,000
For a 501(c)3 organization located in any city with more than twenty
thousand but fewer than twenty-three thousand inhabitants and
that is the county seat of a county with more than forty thousand
but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants that focuses on
improving lives through the training and placement of Service
Dogs for Veterans with disabilities and children with autism
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,466,000
Section 8.010. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For drug task force grants, provided three percent (3%) be allowed for
grant administration
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$78,786
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,100,772
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 0.02 F.T.E.) ............................$3,179,558
Section 8.015. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For scholarships for individuals to attend law enforcement academies
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,000,000 one-time) ....................$3,000,000
For grants to local law enforcement to support equipment and training
needs, provided that a minimum of 35% shall be distributed to
law enforcement agencies within third class counties
Personal Service ....................................................................................................70,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,000,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$13,070,000
Section 8.016. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 7
For the design and implementation of a police academy program at a
college in a city with more than two thousand seven hundred but
fewer than three thousand inhabitants and located in a county
with more than nine thousand nine hundred but fewer than eleven
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with fewer than two
hundred inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$850,000
Section 8.020. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Juvenile Justice Delinquency Prevention Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ..........................................$1,022,492
Section 8.025. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the establishment and enhancement of local violent crime prevention
programs in Missouri communities and improving the quality of
crime data reporting in compliance with the National Incident-
Based Reporting System
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
For a police department located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county for the
purpose of crime prevention through environmental design
training
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 36,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$536,000
Section 8.030. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For a school safety program for all school districts statewide that speaks
directly to 911 services and on/off duty officers through the law
enforcement alert system
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,900,000
Section 8.035. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For a statewide, competitively bid school safety program
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,539,700

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 8
Section 8.040. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For grants to increase access to standardized water safety education and
swim lessons for underserved populations provided by a
community-based nonprofit
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$300,000
Section 8.045. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Narcotics Control Assistance Program and multi-jurisdictional
task forces
From Justice Assistance Grant Program Fund (1782) ...............................................$4,490,000
Section 8.050. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the 988
Public Safety Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$555,122
Section 8.055. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the purpose of providing services for peace officers and first
responders to assist in coping with stress and potential
psychological trauma resulting from a response to a critical
incident or emotionally difficult event
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$53,239
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 503,511
From 988 Public Safety Fund (1864)..............................................................................556,750
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (one-time) ........ 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,056,750
Section 8.060. To the Department of Public Safety
For any entities providing security and/or other services for the 2026
World Cup
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $10,000,000 one-time) ...............$20,000,000
Section 8.065. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 9
For statewide fentanyl testing of water at schools, provided that the
Department of Public Safety shall track and report certain metrics
regarding the testing program, including but not limited to:
schools tested and associated school districts, fentanyl amounts
recorded at each school, and subsequent fentanyl use prevention
strategies enacted by tested schools
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)
(including $2,000,000 one-time) ....................................................................$4,000,000
For statewide fentanyl and additional dangerous narcotics testing of
wastewater at schools for public health and in surrounding areas
for law enforcement activities, provided that the Department of
Public Safety shall track and report certain metrics regarding the
testing program for public health, including but not limited to:
schools tested and associated school districts, narcotics amounts
recorded at each school, and subsequent narcotics use prevention
strategies enacted by tested schools
From Opioid Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................................3,000,000
For law enforcement training in accordance with 8 U.S.C. Section
1357(g) relating to immigration enforcement
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,250,000
Section 8.066. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For distribution to a nonprofit organization that is recognized as a
501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity under the Internal Revenue Code;
has been continuously operating in a city not within a county
since at least 2018; provides safe and sober housing for
individuals managing substance use disorders and co-occurring
mental health conditions; operates multiple recovery homes;
offers a peer respite program designed for individuals in the early
stages of recovery, involving a 30-day intensive therapeutic stay
with daily group therapy sessions; provides wrap-around services
such as counseling, 24-hour peer support, outpatient
programming, and access to Medication-Assisted Treatment
(MAT); assists residents with life skills training, job placement,
workforce development, and peer pre-apprenticeship programs;

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 10
and organizes community outreach events and in-house recovery
activities, including house meetings and recovery speakers
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) (one-time) .................$500,000
Section 8.070. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Sheriff Methamphetamine Relief Taskforce
For supplementing deputy sheriffs’ salary and related employment
benefits pursuant to Section 57.278, RSMo
From Deputy Sheriff Salary Supplementation Fund (1913) ......................................$5,000,000
For grants to support sheriff deputies working in conjunction with the
Missouri State Highway Patrol
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,250,000
Section 8.075. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For operating grants to local law enforcement cybercrimes task forces,
provided three percent (3%) is allowed for grant administration
and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 8.335
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$69,494
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,448,538
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,518,032
Section 8.080. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
To provide financial assistance to the spouses, children, and other
dependents of any local law enforcement officers, paramedics,
emergency medical technicians, corrections officers, and/or
firefighters who have lost their lives performing their duties.
Deaths from natural causes, illnesses, or injuries are outside the
program’s scope, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$70,000
Section 8.085. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 11
For the Services to Victims Program, provided three percent (3%) of
each grant award be allowed for the administrative expenses of
each grantee
From Services to Victims Fund (1592) ......................................................................$2,000,000
Section 8.090. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Violence Against Women Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ..........................................$3,294,343
Section 8.095. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
For the Crime Victims’ Compensation Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,900,000
From Department of Public Safety Crime Victims Federal Fund (1191) ...................4,500,000
From Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund (1681) ......................................................4,837,329
Personal Service ....................................................................................................75,348
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 160,000
From Department of Public Safety Crime Victims Federal Fund (1191) .......................235,348
For reimbursing SAFE-Care providers for performing forensic medical
exams on children suspected of having been physically abused
Personal Service ....................................................................................................44,534
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,222,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,266,534
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$13,739,211
Section 8.100. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Pretrial
Witness Protection Services Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 8.105. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For witness protection services
From Pretrial Witness Protection Services Fund (1868) ...........................................$2,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 12
Section 8.110. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the National Forensic Sciences Improvement Act Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .............................................$376,000
Section 8.115. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the State Forensic Laboratory Program
From State Forensic Laboratory Fund (1591) ..............................................................$360,000
Section 8.120. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Residential Substance Abuse Treatment Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .............................................$742,000
Section 8.125. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For peace officer training
From Peace Officer Standards and Training Commission Fund (1281).......................$950,000
Section 8.130. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For body worn cameras and related data storage for the Missouri State
Highway Patrol and Capitol Police
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$277,031
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) .......................................................................120,051
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,979
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,080,460
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 1,162,439
Total (Not to exceed 2.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,559,521
Section 8.131. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the planning, design, maintenance, and construction of a training
facility for law enforcement in a city with more than eighty-five
thousand but fewer than ninety-five thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$4,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 13
Section 8.132. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For a police department in a city with more than eighteen thousand but
fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and located in a county
with more than one million inhabitants to support public safety
initiatives
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 8.133. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For distribution to a city with more than ninety-five thousand but fewer
than one hundred five thousand inhabitants for the planning,
design, and construction of an emergency joint operations facility
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,500,000
Section 8.134. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For distribution to a city with more than ninety-five thousand but fewer
than one hundred five thousand inhabitants for the planning,
design, construction, and equipment acquisition of an
interoperable communications system for the emergency joint
operations facility
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 8.135. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Capitol Police, provided that not more than five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,721,073
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 188,953
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 46.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,910,026
Section 8.140. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Administration, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service ................................................................................................$471,730
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 25,512

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 14
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................497,242
Personal Service .............................................................................................10,531,352
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,056,322
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................13,587,674
Personal Service ....................................................................................................52,614
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 26,953
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ..........................................................................79,567
Personal Service ......................................................................................................4,905
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,980
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) .........................................................................18,885
For the High-Intensity Drug Trafficking Area Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................2,598,000
For a peer support program for law enforcement and first responders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 140,000
Total (Not to exceed 134.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$16,921,368
Section 8.145. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For fringe benefits, including retirement contributions for members of
the Missouri Department of Transportation and Highway Patrol
Employees’ Retirement System, and insurance premiums,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 8.335
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$20,897,673
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,715,824
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................22,613,497
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,803,194
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 241,576
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................5,044,770
Personal Service ....................................................................................................44,654
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 461,073
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................505,727
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,891,285

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 15
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 153,188
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) ....................................................................2,044,473
Personal Service ..................................................................................................370,605
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 29,480
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ............................400,085
Personal Service ...........................................................................................112,529,220
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,056,628
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................121,585,848
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,435,144
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 321,517
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ...............................................................4,756,661
Personal Service ..................................................................................................124,780
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,952
From Highway Patrol Academy Fund (1674) ................................................................137,732
Personal Service ......................................................................................................5,766
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 889
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695) ...........................................................................................6,655
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,102
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,917
From DNA Profiling Analysis Fund (1772) .....................................................................88,019
Personal Service ....................................................................................................90,056
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,405
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758) .........................................................96,461
Personal Service ....................................................................................................94,880
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,742
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297) .................................................... 104,622
Total .......................................................................................................................$157,384,550
Section 8.150. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Enforcement Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 16
Personal Service (including $201,544 one-time) .........................................$16,796,155
Expense and Equipment (including $957,238 one-time) ......................... 3,693,556
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................20,489,711
Personal Service .............................................................................................99,879,906
Expense and Equipment (including $1,848,008 one-time) ...................... 10,510,357
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................110,390,263
Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in compliance
with the United States Department of Justice Equitable Sharing
Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194) (including $400,000 one-time) ......................800,000
Personal Service
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ....................................................................21,682
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) (including $264,001 one-time) ......................859,918
Personal Service ....................................................................................................10,106
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 457,510
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695) .......................................................................................467,616
Expense and Equipment
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758) .......................................................245,242
Personal Service
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) .......................................................................240,435
For the Governor's Security Detail
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,517,045
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies, provided
the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of any new
funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended, in
writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,592,171

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 17
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,856,301
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ..........................................12,448,472
For a statewide interoperable communication system
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 11,212,926
Total (Not to exceed 1,319.00 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$158,693,310
Section 8.151. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For a public order unit program
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$300,000
Section 8.155. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Water Patrol Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,997,659
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 284,764
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,282,423
Personal Service ..................................................................................................383,855
Expense and Equipment (including $246,000 one-time) ......................... 2,496,590
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................2,880,445
Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in compliance
with the United States Department of Justice Equitable Sharing
Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194) ..........................................................................16,499
For the Water Patrol Division
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,346,919
Expense and Equipment (including $264,001 one-time) ......................... 1,845,588
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) ............................................................ 4,192,507
Total (Not to exceed 79.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,371,874
Section 8.156. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 18
For wage adjustments equal to the percentage increases shown by job
class, in addition to any other statewide pay plan adjustments
applicable elsewhere in this act, for uniformed and commissioned
Highway Patrol troopers as well as uniformed and commissioned
commercial vehicle officers in the following job classes, and no
other job classes:
V07000 - Colonel - 6.8%
V07001 - Lieutenant Colonel - 6.8%
V07002 - Major - 6.8%
V07003 - Captain - 6.8%
V07004 - Lieutenant - 6.8%
V07005 - Sergeant - 6.8%
V07006 - Corporal - 6.8%
V07007 - Trooper 1st Class - 6.8%
V07008 - Trooper - 6.8%
V07009 - Probationary Trooper - 6.8%
V07743 - CVO Chief - 3.0%
V07744 - Division Assistant Director - 3.0%
V07742 - CVO Supervisor - 3.0%
V07741 - Commercial Vehicle Officer - 3.0%
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,370,627
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .................................................40,006
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................843,161
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) .......................................................................169,172
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ..........................6,413,137
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ....................................................... 8,601
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,844,704
Section 8.160. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For gasoline expenses for State Highway Patrol vehicles, including
aircraft and Gaming Commission vehicles, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
8.335
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$783,007
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) .....................................................................1,029,089

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 19
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 7,027,500
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,839,596
Section 8.165. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For purchase of vehicles, aircraft, and watercraft for the State Highway
Patrol and the Gaming Commission in accordance with Section
43.265, RSMo, also for maintenance and repair costs for vehicles,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 8.335
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $311,400 one-time) ..........................$721,199
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................6,323,075
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695) (including $303,726 one-time) ................................10,017,174
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 549,074
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,610,522
Section 8.170. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Crime Labs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,182,164
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 1,291,654
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,473,818
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,530,481
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,568,316
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................7,098,797
Personal Service ....................................................................................................85,895
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,478,305
From DNA Profiling Analysis Fund (1772) ................................................................1,564,200
Personal Service ..................................................................................................297,770
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 900,071
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................1,197,841
Personal Service ..................................................................................................456,080
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,575

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 20
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ..................................................................458,655
Expense and Equipment
From State Forensic Laboratory Fund (1591) ................................................................357,633
For forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing to be used to help solve
violent crimes, identify unidentified human remains for the
purpose of identification of such remains, and support county law
enforcement, medical examiners, state universities and coroners
in cold case investigations. This includes communications,
training, and data basing related FGG DNA testing. However,
any third-party DNA testing labs shall be vetted through and
approved by the Department of Health and Senior Services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 1,337,018
Total (Not to exceed 129.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,487,962
Section 8.175. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Law Enforcement Academy, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$220,386
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .................................................59,687
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ..........................................................................69,440
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,162,076
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 77,476
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................2,239,552
Personal Service ..................................................................................................153,050
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 581,730
From Highway Patrol Academy Fund (1674) ..................................................... 734,780
Total (Not to exceed 37.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,323,845
Section 8.180. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 21
For Vehicle and Driver Safety
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .............................................$350,000
Personal Service .............................................................................................15,193,966
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,192,484
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................16,386,450
Personal Service ..................................................................................................165,400
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 360,632
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297) .................................................... 526,032
Total (Not to exceed 299.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,262,482
Section 8.185. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For refunding unused motor vehicle inspection stickers
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$100,000
Section 8.190. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Technical Services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service ................................................................................................$318,160
Expense and Equipment (including $161,693 one-time) ......................... 1,605,673
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,923,833
Personal Service ..................................................................................................586,942
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,995,288
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................5,582,230
Personal Service .............................................................................................20,783,790
Expense and Equipment (including $10,000 one-time) ........................... 22,258,458
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................43,042,248
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,010,453
Expense and Equipment ...................................................................................2,235,117
For National Criminal Record Reviews ................................................... 3,000,000
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) .............................................................10,245,570

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 22
For Livescan purchases, Livescan lease agreements in full, and Livescan
maintenance costs incurred by local and county law enforcement
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ...............................................................1,715,000
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................233,040
Personal Service
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758) .......................................................104,878
Expense and Equipment
From Criminal Justice Network and Technology Revolving Fund (1842) .................2,819,050
Personal Service
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ................. 493,220
Total (Not to exceed 360.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$66,159,069
Section 8.195. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the recoupment, receipt, and disbursement of funds for equipment
replacement, and expenses
Expense and Equipment
From Highway Patrol Expense Fund (1793) ..................................................................$35,000
Section 8.196. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Highway Patrol
For mental health services for members of the Patrol
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$250,000
Section 8.200. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund pursuant to Section 307.365, RSMo
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297) ..........................................................$2,000,000
Section 8.205. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control
Personal Service ................................................................................................$547,744
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 397,594
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................945,338

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 23
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,242,723
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 577,277
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) ............................ 2,820,000
Total (Not to exceed 38.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,765,338
Section 8.210. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control
For refunds for unused liquor and beer licenses and for liquor and beer
stamps not used and canceled
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$55,000
Section 8.215. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety, provided for all funds in this section, five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to
expense and equipment and three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,053,592
Expense and Equipment (including $233,500 one-time) ....................................422,229
Program Distribution (one-time) .............................................................. 3,000,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,475,821
For receiving and expending National Fire Academy Grants and
Assistance to Firefighter Grants
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................600,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................545,809
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 74,713
From Elevator Safety Fund (1257) ................................................................................620,522
Personal Service ..................................................................................................646,525
Expense and Equipment (including $42,079 one-time) .......................... 460,546
From Boiler and Pressure Vessels Safety Fund (1744) ..............................................1,107,071
Personal Service ..................................................................................................113,335
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,027
From Missouri Explosives Safety Act Administration Fund (1804) .............................125,362
To allow the State Fire Marshal to disburse grants to any applying
volunteer fire protection association for the purpose of funding
such association’s costs related to worker’s compensation
premiums for volunteer firefighters

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 24
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .............................................................................200,000
For an organization located in any city with more than one hundred
twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand
inhabitants whose focus is to plan, develop, deliver and
administer state-of-the-art continuing professional education
courses which meet the comprehensive training needs of fire and
rescue personnel and other emergency managers and responders
utilizing the most efficient and effective means possible, thereby
enabling them to better protect lives and property within their
communities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 760,000
Total (Not to exceed 68.92 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$9,888,776
Section 8.220. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed from personal service to expense and equipment
For the Fire Safe Cigarette Program
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$28,224
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,204
From Cigarette Fire Safety Standard and Firefighter Protection Act Fund
(1937) ..................................................................................................................$38,428
Section 8.225. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety
For firefighter training contracted services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587) .................................................100,000
From Fire Education Fund (1821) ....................................................................... 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,350,000
Section 8.226. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety
For a fire department grant program, provided volunteer fire departments
be given priority and preference
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$5,000,000
Section 8.227. To the Department of Public Safety

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 25
For the Division of Fire Safety
For capital improvements to a fire station in a census designated place
with more than one hundred but fewer than one hundred sixteen
inhabitants and located in a county with more than nineteen
thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than
thirteen thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$225,000
For capital improvements to a fire house in a city with more than one
hundred thirty-one but fewer than one hundred forty-eight
inhabitants and located in a county with more than nineteen
thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than
thirteen thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 450,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$675,000
Section 8.230. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For Administration and Service to Veterans
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,485,350
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,822,643
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .......................8,307,993
Expense and Equipment
From Veterans’ Trust Fund (1579) ...................................................................................23,832
For housing assistance for veterans
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,500,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ......................................................................1,500,000
For the purpose of supporting a project providing temporary housing for
veterans located in a city not within a county which has a proven
track record in five states with two locations in Missouri. The
funding shall be for matching funds to construct homes with
fewer than 450 square feet of living space on a campus that
supports the veterans’ physical and mental health needs to
transition to sustainable living
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 26
For a grant to a veteran-only, non-profit homeless shelter that provides
emergency housing and a transitional living program to veterans
and such shelter is located in a city with more than one hundred
twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 1,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 115.61 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$12,831,825
Section 8.231. To the Department of Public Safety
For an organization located in any county with more than seven hundred
thousand but fewer than eight hundred thousand inhabitants that
is dedicated to serving Veterans through a holistic approach to
healthcare, focusing on mental health, chiropractic, podiatry and
family medicine
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000
Section 8.232. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For repairs and renovations to a facility operated by a nonprofit
organization in a city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
that provides permanent housing and supportive services to
veterans experiencing homelessness and participating in the
Veterans Affairs Supporting Housing Program
From Veterans Assistance Fund (1461) (one-time) ......................................................$175,000
Section 8.235. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For the restoration, renovation, maintenance, and improvements to a
World War I Memorial and Museum
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
From World War I Memorial Trust Fund (1993) (including $200,000
one-time) .................................................................................................. 350,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,350,000
Section 8.240. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For veterans’ health and safety initiatives
From Veterans Assistance Fund (1461) .....................................................................$4,557,800

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 27
Section 8.245. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For the Veterans’ Service Officer Program
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .....................$1,600,740
Section 8.250. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For Missouri Veterans’ Homes
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$88,123,110
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,417,601
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) ........................................................112,540,711
Expense and Equipment
From Veterans’ Trust Fund (1579) ...................................................................................52,528
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Stimulus - 2021 Fund (2458) ..................7,651,047
Personal Service
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ............................39,211
For refunds to veterans and/or the U.S. Department of Veterans’ Affairs
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) ............................................................1,274,400
For overtime to state employees. Non-exempt state employees identified
by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any remaining
funds being used to pay overtime to any other state employees
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) .................................................... 2,176,346
Total (Not to exceed 1,575.98 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$123,734,243
Section 8.255. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For the operations of Veterans’ Homes and cemeteries, utilities, systems
furniture, and structural modifications
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ........................$299,099
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) .................................................... 4,149,402
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,448,501
Section 8.260. To the Department of Public Safety

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 28
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $10,000,000 one-time) ................$31,675,057
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .....................................1
From Veterans Reinvestment Fund (1611) ................................................................16,886,195
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) .................................................... 13,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$61,561,253
Section 8.265. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For the Divisions of Gaming and Bingo
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$19,915,244
Annual Salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ........................................................................................................................260
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,737,408
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ...................................................................21,652,912
Expense and Equipment
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249) ........................................................................56,310
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ...................................................5,000,000
For a digital mental health program for problematic gambling, delivered
through a single digital platform provider with a business location
in the State of Missouri that must offer no-cost, multilingual,
community and anonymous support for individuals and their
loved ones, provided that the platform must include dedicated
functionality for supporters, providing tailored resources to help
them assist those struggling with gambling addiction
From Compulsive Gamblers Fund (1249) ........................................................... 850,000
Total (Not to exceed 227.75 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$27,559,222
Section 8.270. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For fringe benefits, including retirement contributions for members of
the Missouri Department of Transportation and Highway Patrol
Employees’ Retirement System, and insurance premiums for
State Highway Patrol employees assigned to work under the
direction of the Gaming Commission

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 29
Personal Service .............................................................................................$9,517,152
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 631,152
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) .................................................................$10,148,304
Section 8.271. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For the enforcement of sports wagering provided under Article III
Section 39(g) of the Constitution of the state of Missouri
Personal Service ................................................................................................$308,520
Expense and Equipment (including $160,753 one-time) ......................... 272,896
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) (Not to exceed 3.00 F.T.E.) .........................$581,416
Section 8.275. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount that
is credited to the Gaming Commission Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ......................................................................$100,000
Section 8.280. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount
received for bingo fees
From Bingo Proceeds for Education Fund (1289) ............................................................$5,000
Section 8.285. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount that
is credited to the Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund
From Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund (1285) .......................................................$50,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the state treasury to the Sports
Wagering Proceeds for Education Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 1,084,066
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,134,066
Section 8.290. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For breeder incentive payments
From Missouri Breeders Fund (1605)...............................................................................$5,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 30
Section 8.295. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) .................................................................$11,000,000
Section 8.300. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri National Guard Trust Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ...................................................................$4,000,000
Section 8.305. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Access
Missouri Financial Assistance Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ...................................................................$5,000,000
Section 8.310. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Compulsive Gamblers Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ......................................................................$194,181
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 5,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,194,181
Section 8.315. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For Administration and Emergency Operations, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service (including $3,161,975 one-time) ........................................$5,539,541
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 203,168
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,742,709
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,488,656
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 909,819
From State Emergency Management (1145) ...............................................................3,398,475
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,841,025
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,059,874
From Department of Health and Senior Services – Federal Fund (1143) ...................2,900,899

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 31
Personal Service ..................................................................................................355,278
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,350
From Missouri Disaster Fund (1663) .............................................................................382,628
Personal Service ..................................................................................................206,361
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 130,344
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587) ...................................... 336,705
Total (Not to exceed 95.49 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,761,416
Section 8.316. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Missouri Disaster Medical Assistance Team
Personal Service ................................................................................................$259,718
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 100,000
From General Revenue (1101) (Not to exceed 12.00 F.T.E.) .......................................$359,718
Section 8.320. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Missouri Task Force 1
For expenses of Missouri Task Force 1, a division of the Boone County
Fire Protection District, when it responds to emergencies and
disasters in the State of Missouri and conducts annual training
and exercises. These expenses may include, but are not limited to
personnel salaries and benefits, supplies, and repair or
replacement of damaged equipment, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,000,000 one-time) ....................$1,225,000
Section 8.325. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Community Right-to-Know Act
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587) ...............................................$750,000
For local emergency planning commissions to implement the federal
Hazardous Materials Transportation Uniform Safety Act of 1990
From State Emergency Management (1145) ....................................................... 595,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,345,000
Section 8.330. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 32
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from federal and other
sources that are deposited in the State Treasury for administrative
and training expenses of the State Emergency Management
Agency and for first responder training programs, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
8.335
From State Emergency Management (1145) ...........................................................$29,262,386
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from federal and other
sources that are deposited in the State Treasury for the use of the
State Emergency Management Agency for alleviating distress
from disasters
From Missouri Disaster Fund (1663) .......................................................................301,213,964
For matching funds for federal grants and for emergency assistance
expenses of the State Emergency Management Agency as
provided in Section 44.032, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,048,548
For expenses of any state agency responding during a declared
emergency at the direction of the governor provided the services
furnish immediate aid and relief
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,190,729
For expenses of non-declared disasters to include response, recovery, or
mitigation activities, and preparation and planning to local
emergency planning commissions, districts, and management
agencies
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For expenses of any state agency responding during an agricultural
disaster at the direction of the governor
From Agriculture Disaster Resiliency Fund (1665) (one-time) ........................... 3,500,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$348,215,627
Section 8.335. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 33
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 8.500. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Administration, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,046,422
Annual Salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................45,023
Expense and Equipment (including $15,333 one-time) ........................... 198,392
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,289,837
Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in compliance
with the United States Department of Justice Equitable Sharing
Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1141) ............................................................. 240,944
Total (Not to exceed 30.48 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,530,781
Section 8.505. To the Department of the National Guard
For activities in support of the Missouri National Guard, including the
National Guard Tuition Assistance Program and the Military
Honors Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$54,447
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,343,965
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,398,412
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,200,632
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,201,247
From Missouri National Guard Trust Fund (1900) .............................................. 5,401,879
Total (Not to exceed 43.40 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$8,800,291
Section 8.510. To the Department of the National Guard
For maintenance and repair of the U.S.S. Missouri Memorial at Pearl
Harbor
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
Section 8.515. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Veterans Recognition Program
Personal Service ................................................................................................$143,546
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 200,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 34
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) (Not
to exceed 3.00 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$343,546
Section 8.520. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Field Support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,301,335
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,901,217
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,202,552
Personal Service ..................................................................................................150,504
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 98,417
From Adjutant General - Federal Fund (1190) .................................................... 248,921
Total (Not to exceed 42.37 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,451,473
Section 8.525. To the Department of the National Guard
For operational expenses at armories from armory rental fees
Expense and Equipment
From Adjutant General Revolving Fund (1530) .............................................................$55,000
Section 8.530. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Missouri Military Family Relief Program
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................$10,000
For grants to family members of the National Guard and reservists who are
in financial need ....................................................................................... 140,000
From Missouri Military Family Relief Fund (1719).....................................................$150,000
Section 8.535. To the Department of the National Guard
For training site operating costs
From Missouri National Guard Training Site Fund (1269) ..........................................$330,000
Section 8.540. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Contract Services, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service ................................................................................................$642,346
Expense and Equipment (including $258,546 one-time) ......................... 286,319
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................928,665
Personal Service .............................................................................................21,094,367
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 16,814,816

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 35
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................37,909,183
Personal Service
From Missouri National Guard Training Site Fund (1269) ..............................................30,361
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri National Guard Trust Fund (1900) .........................................................673,938
For refund of federal overpayments to the state for the Contract Services
Program
From Adjutant General - Federal Fund (1190) .................................................... 865,561
Total (Not to exceed 397.80 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$40,407,708
Section 8.545. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Office of Air Search and Rescue, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$65,743
Section 8.550. To the Department of the National Guard
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 8.2005. To the Department of Public Safety
In reference to Sections 8.005 through 8.335 of this act:
No funds shall be spent for any flight on a state aircraft where an
elected official will be on board without a flight plan being made
publicly available via a global aviation data services organization
that operates both a website and mobile application which
provides free flight tracking of both private and commercial
aircraft.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 8 36
PART 3
Section 8.3005. To the Department of Public Safety
In reference to Section 8.330 of Part 1 of this act:
The Department of Public Safety shall notify the General
Assembly on a monthly basis of the status of disaster payments.
Such notification shall include, but not limited to completed
disaster payments and disaster payments outstanding.
Department of Public Safety Totals
General Revenue Fund (467.21 F.T.E.) .................................................................$213,222,848
Federal Funds (115.46 F.T.E.) .................................................................................431,081,979
Other Funds (4,047.13 F.T.E.) ............................................................................ 600,882,284
Total (4,629.80 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$1,245,187,111
Department of National Guard Totals
General Revenue Fund (83.61 F.T.E.) .......................................................................$9,935,210
Federal Funds (388.12 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................38,399,048
Other Funds (45.32 F.T.E.) ................................................................................. 6,984,724
Total (517.05 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................$55,318,982
